Connecticut, session 2026, SB00489.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subdivision (5) of section 4-250 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(5) "Large state contract" means an agreement or a combination or
series of agreements between a state agency or a quasi-public agency
and a person, firm or corporation, having a total value of more than five
hundred thousand dollars in a calendar or fiscal year, for (A) a project
for the construction, alteration or repair of any public building or public
work, (B) services, including, but not limited to, consulting and
professional services, (C) the procurement of supplies, materials or
equipment, (D) a lease, or (E) a licensing arrangement. [The term "large
state contract"] "Large state contract" does not include a contract
between a state agency or a quasi-public agency and a political
SB489 / File No. 506 1

SB489 File No. 506
subdivision of the state;
Sec. 2. Subsection (b) of section 4b-24b of the 2026 supplement to the
general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(b) The commissioner may designate projects to be accomplished on
a total cost basis for (1) new facilities to provide for the substantial space
needs of a requesting agency, (2) the installation of mechanical or
electrical equipment systems in existing state facilities, or (3) the
demolition of any state facility that the commissioner is authorized to
demolish under the general statutes. If the commissioner designates a
project as a designated total cost basis project, the commissioner may
enter into a single contract with a private developer which may include
such project elements as site acquisition, architectural design and
construction. The commissioner shall select a private developer from
among the developers who are selected and recommended by the award
panels established in this subdivision. All contracts for such designated
projects shall be based on competitive proposals received by the
commissioner, who shall give notice of such project, and specifications
for the project, by posting notice on the State Contracting Portal. No
contract which includes the construction, reconstruction, alteration,
remodeling, repair or demolition of any public building for work by the
state for which the total cost is estimated to be more than five hundred
thousand dollars may be awarded to a person who is not prequalified
for the work, in accordance with the provisions of section 4a-100. The
commissioner shall determine all other requirements and conditions for
such proposals and awards and shall have sole responsibility for all
other aspects of such contracts. Such contracts shall state clearly the
responsibilities of the developer to deliver a completed and acceptable
product on a date certain, the maximum cost of the project and, as a
separate item, the cost of site acquisition, if applicable. No such contract
may be entered into by the commissioner without the prior approval of
the State Properties Review Board and unless funding has been
authorized pursuant to the general statutes or a public or special act.
SB489 / File No. 506 2

SB489 File No. 506
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 4-250(5)
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 4b-24b(b)
GAE Joint Favorable
SB489 / File No. 506 3

SB489 File No. 506
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which makes technical changes to statutes concerning state
contracting, results in no fiscal impact.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB489 / File No. 506 4

SB489 File No. 506
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 489
AN ACT MAKING TECHNICAL CHANGES TO STATUTES
CONCERNING STATE CONTRACTING.